Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1210
Job training grant; rules and regulations.

The Department of Economic Development shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to govern the award and disbursement of job training grants.

Laws 1995, LB 326, § 9.